Illinois, session 104th, HB362.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 521 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products 6Act is amended by changing Section 0.01 as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 675/0.01)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2356.9)8    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and 10Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act. 11(Source: P.A. 101-2, eff. 7-1-19.)